Wyoming, session 2025, HB0209.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 37-1-101(a)(intro) and 37-2-134(a)(i)
and (iv) are amended to read:

37-1-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in chapters 1, 2, 3, 12, and 17 and 18 of
this title:
HB0209

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0502

37-2-134. Electric generation facility closures;
presumption; commission review.

(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Dispatchable" means as defined in W.S.
37-18-101(a)(ii) a source of electricity that is available
for use on demand and that can be dispatched upon request
of a power grid operator or that can have its power output
adjusted, according to market needs and includes
dispatchability;

(iv) "Reliable" means as defined in W.S.
37-18-101(a)(iv) generated electricity that is not subject
to intermittent availability.

Section 2. W.S. 37-1-101(a)(vi)(N), 37-18-101 and
37-18-102 are repealed.

Section 3. The public service commission shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

HB0209

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0502
Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0209